Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.450

Occupational and environmental research facility—Construction and maintenance authorized—Purpose.

There shall be constructed and maintained at the University of Washington an occupational and environmental research facility in the school of medicine having as its objects and purposes testing, research, training, teaching, consulting and service in the fields of industrial and occupational medicine and health, the prevention of industrial and occupational disease among workers, the promotion and protection of safer working environments and dissemination of the knowledge and information acquired from such objects and purposes.

[ 1989 c 12 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.450. Prior: 1963 c 151 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.77.410.]